src/fst/phonology.twolc
! lupa : luvan
"RULE: p:v"
!! **@RULENAME@** 
p:v <=> [ #: ] Cns* Vws ( r | l | Vws ) _ [ GRC | %^TS:0 i %>:0 %^WCns:0 ] ;

"RULE: double pp to p"
!! **@RULENAME@** 
p:0 <=> [ #: Cns* Vws ( m ) p | #: Cns* Vws Vws p | Cns* Vws+ Cns+ Vws+ p ] _ [ GRC | %^TS:0 i %>:0 %^WCns:0 ] ;

!! Vowel raising
"RULE: o:u ö:y in Inf"
!! **@RULENAME@** 
 Vx:Vy <=> _ Vx: %>:0 v v AÄ1: %^RVws:0 ;
           Vx: _ %>:0 v v AÄ1: %^RVws:0 ;
          where Vx in (o ö)
                Vy in (u y) matched ;

!!
!"Disallow WLoss after non-v"
!WLoss:0 /<= [[ :* Letters ] - [ :* [ в л | в О1: л ] ] ] %>:0 _ ;

!"Disallow V3 after two consecutive realized vowels"
! V3: /<= :Vws :0* :Vws :0* _ ;
